Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202479-3109
School Safety and Security Fund; created; use; investment.

The School Safety and Security Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the State Department of Education and shall consist of any money transferred by the Legislature and any gifts, grants, or bequests. The department shall use money in the fund for grants for security-related infrastructure projects pursuant to section 79-3108. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 125;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 30.
August 21, 2024
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.